sanskrit-hyphenation.tex
1ś2r2y2á
1ś2r2y2è
1ś2r2y2é
1ś2r2y2ì
1ś2r2y2í
1ś2r2y2ò
1ś2r2y2ó
1ś2r2y2ù
1ś2r2y2ú
1ś2r2y2ā
1ś2r2y2ī
1ś2r2y2ĺ̥
1ś2r2y2ŕ̥
1ś2r2y2ū
1ś2r2y2ḷ
1ś2r2y2ḹ
1ś2r2y2ṛ
1ś2r2y2ṝ
1ś2r2à
1ś2r2á
1ś2r2è
1ś2r2é
1ś2r2ì
1ś2r2í
1ś2r2ò
1ś2r2ó
1ś2r2ù
1ś2r2ú
1ś2r2ā
1ś2r2ī
1ś2r2ĺ̥
1ś2r2ŕ̥
1ś2r2ū
1ś2r2ḷ
1ś2r2ḹ
1ś2r2ṛ
1ś2r2ṝ
1ś2ṛ
1ś2r̥
1ś2u
1ś2v2a
1ś2v2e
1ś2v2i
1ś2v2ḷ
1ś2v2l̥
1ś2v2o
1ś2v2ṛ
1ś2v2r̥
1ś2v2u
1ś2v2à
1ś2v2á
1ś2v2è
1ś2v2é
1ś2v2ì
1ś2v2í
1ś2v2ò
1ś2v2ó
1ś2v2ù
1ś2v2ú
1ś2v2ā
1ś2v2ī
1ś2v2ĺ̥
1ś2v2ŕ̥
1ś2v2ū
1ś2v2ḷ
1ś2v2ḹ
1ś2v2ṛ
1ś2v2ṝ
1ś2y2a
1ś2y2e
1ś2y2i
1ś2y2ḷ
1ś2y2l̥
1ś2y2o
1ś2y2ṛ
1ś2y2r̥
1ś2y2u
1ś2y2à
1ś2y2á
1ś2y2è
1ś2y2é
1ś2y2ì
1ś2y2í
1ś2y2ò
1ś2y2ó
1ś2y2ù
1ś2y2ú
1ś2y2ā
1ś2y2ī
1ś2y2ĺ̥
1ś2y2ŕ̥
1ś2y2ū
1ś2y2ḷ
1ś2y2ḹ
1ś2y2ṛ
1ś2y2ṝ
1ś2à
1ś2á
1ś2è
1ś2é
1ś2ì
1ś2í
1ś2ò
1ś2ó
1ś2ù
1ś2ú
1ś2ā
1ś2ī
1ś2ĺ̥
1ś2ŕ̥
1ś2ū
1ś2ḷ
1ś2ḹ
1ś2ṛ
1ś2ṝ
1ḍ2a
1ḍ2e
1ḍ2h2a
1ḍ2h2e
1ḍ2h2i
1ḍ2h2ḷ
1ḍ2h2l̥
1ḍ2h2o
1ḍ2h2ṛ
1ḍ2h2r̥
1ḍ2h2u
1ḍ2h2à
1ḍ2h2á
1ḍ2h2è
1ḍ2h2é
1ḍ2h2ì
1ḍ2h2í
1ḍ2h2ò
1ḍ2h2ó
1ḍ2h2ù
1ḍ2h2ú
1ḍ2h2ā
1ḍ2h2ī
1ḍ2h2ĺ̥
1ḍ2h2ŕ̥
1ḍ2h2ū
1ḍ2h2ḷ
1ḍ2h2ḹ
1ḍ2h2ṛ
1ḍ2h2ṝ
1ḍ2i
1ḍ2ḷ
1ḍ2l̥
1ḍ2o
1ḍ2ṛ
1ḍ2r̥
1ḍ2u
1ḍ2v2a
1ḍ2v2e
1ḍ2v2i
1ḍ2v2ḷ
1ḍ2v2l̥
1ḍ2v2o
1ḍ2v2ṛ
1ḍ2v2r̥
1ḍ2v2u
1ḍ2v2à
1ḍ2v2á
1ḍ2v2è
1ḍ2v2é
1ḍ2v2ì
1ḍ2v2í
1ḍ2v2ò
1ḍ2v2ó
1ḍ2v2ù
1ḍ2v2ú
1ḍ2v2ā
1ḍ2v2ī
1ḍ2v2ĺ̥
1ḍ2v2ŕ̥
1ḍ2v2ū
1ḍ2v2ḷ
1ḍ2v2ḹ
1ḍ2v2ṛ
1ḍ2v2ṝ
1ḍ2à
1ḍ2á
1ḍ2è
1ḍ2é
1ḍ2ì
1ḍ2í
1ḍ2ò
1ḍ2ó
1ḍ2ù
1ḍ2ú
1ḍ2ā
1ḍ2ī
1ḍ2ĺ̥
1ḍ2ŕ̥
1ḍ2ū
1ḍ2ḷ
1ḍ2ḹ
1ḍ2ṛ
1ḍ2ṝ
1ṅ2a
1ṅ2e
1ṅ2i
1ṅ2ḷ
1ṅ2l̥
1ṅ2o
1ṅ2ṛ
1ṅ2r̥
1ṅ2u
1ṅ2à
1ṅ2á
1ṅ2è
1ṅ2é
1ṅ2ì
1ṅ2í
1ṅ2ò
1ṅ2ó
1ṅ2ù
1ṅ2ú
1ṅ2ā
1ṅ2ī
1ṅ2ĺ̥
1ṅ2ŕ̥
1ṅ2ū
1ṅ2ḷ
1ṅ2ḹ
1ṅ2ṛ
1ṅ2ṝ
1ṇ2a
1ṇ2e
1ṇ2i
1ṇ2ḷ
1ṇ2l̥
1ṇ2o
1ṇ2ṛ
1ṇ2r̥
1ṇ2u
1ṇ2y2a
1ṇ2y2e
1ṇ2y2i
1ṇ2y2ḷ
1ṇ2y2l̥
1ṇ2y2o
1ṇ2y2ṛ
1ṇ2y2r̥
1ṇ2y2u
1ṇ2y2à
1ṇ2y2á
1ṇ2y2è
1ṇ2y2é
1ṇ2y2ì
1ṇ2y2í
1ṇ2y2ò
1ṇ2y2ó
1ṇ2y2ù
1ṇ2y2ú
1ṇ2y2ā
1ṇ2y2ī
1ṇ2y2ĺ̥
1ṇ2y2ŕ̥
1ṇ2y2ū
1ṇ2y2ḷ
1ṇ2y2ḹ
1ṇ2y2ṛ
1ṇ2y2ṝ
1ṇ2à
1ṇ2á
1ṇ2è
1ṇ2é
1ṇ2ì
1ṇ2í
1ṇ2ò
1ṇ2ó
1ṇ2ù
1ṇ2ú
1ṇ2ā
1ṇ2ī
1ṇ2ĺ̥
1ṇ2ŕ̥
1ṇ2ū
1ṇ2ḷ
1ṇ2ḹ
1ṇ2ṛ
1ṇ2ṝ
1ṣ2a
1ṣ2e
1ṣ2i
1ṣ2ḷ
1ṣ2l̥
1ṣ2o
1ṣ2ṛ
1ṣ2r̥
1ṣ2u
1ṣ2v2a
1ṣ2v2e
1ṣ2v2i
1ṣ2v2ḷ
1ṣ2v2l̥
1ṣ2v2o
1ṣ2v2ṛ
1ṣ2v2r̥
1ṣ2v2u
1ṣ2v2à
1ṣ2v2á
1ṣ2v2è
1ṣ2v2é
1ṣ2v2ì
1ṣ2v2í
1ṣ2v2ò
1ṣ2v2ó
1ṣ2v2ù
1ṣ2v2ú
1ṣ2v2ā
1ṣ2v2ī
1ṣ2v2ĺ̥
1ṣ2v2ŕ̥
1ṣ2v2ū
1ṣ2v2ḷ
1ṣ2v2ḹ
1ṣ2v2ṛ
1ṣ2v2ṝ
1ṣ2à
1ṣ2á
1ṣ2è
1ṣ2é
1ṣ2ì
1ṣ2í
1ṣ2ò
1ṣ2ó
1ṣ2ù
1ṣ2ú
1ṣ2ā
1ṣ2ī
1ṣ2ĺ̥
1ṣ2ŕ̥
1ṣ2ū
1ṣ2ḷ
1ṣ2ḹ
1ṣ2ṛ
1ṣ2ṝ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2a
1ṣ2ṭ2h2e
1ṣ2ṭ2h2i
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ḷ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2l̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2o
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ṛ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2r̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2u
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2a
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2e
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2i
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ḷ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2l̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2o
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ṛ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2r̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2u
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2à
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2á
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2è
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2é
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ì
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2í
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ò
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ó
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ù
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ú
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ā
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ī
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ĺ̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ŕ̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ū
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ḷ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ḹ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ṛ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2y2ṝ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2à
1ṣ2ṭ2h2á
1ṣ2ṭ2h2è
1ṣ2ṭ2h2é
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ì
1ṣ2ṭ2h2í
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ò
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ó
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ù
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ú
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ā
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ī
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ĺ̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ŕ̥
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ū
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ḷ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ḹ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ṛ
1ṣ2ṭ2h2ṝ
1ṣ2ṭ2y2a
1ṣ2ṭ2y2e
1ṣ2ṭ2y2i
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ḷ
1ṣ2ṭ2y2l̥
1ṣ2ṭ2y2o
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ṛ
1ṣ2ṭ2y2r̥
1ṣ2ṭ2y2u
1ṣ2ṭ2y2à
1ṣ2ṭ2y2á
1ṣ2ṭ2y2è
1ṣ2ṭ2y2é
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ì
1ṣ2ṭ2y2í
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ò
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ó
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ù
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ú
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ā
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ī
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ĺ̥
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ŕ̥
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ū
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ḷ
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ḹ
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ṛ
1ṣ2ṭ2y2ṝ
1ṭ2a
1ṭ2e
1ṭ2h2a
1ṭ2h2e
1ṭ2h2i
1ṭ2h2ḷ
1ṭ2h2l̥
1ṭ2h2o
1ṭ2h2ṛ
1ṭ2h2r̥
1ṭ2h2u
1ṭ2h2à
1ṭ2h2á
1ṭ2h2è
1ṭ2h2é
1ṭ2h2ì
1ṭ2h2í
1ṭ2h2ò
1ṭ2h2ó
1ṭ2h2ù
1ṭ2h2ú
1ṭ2h2ā
1ṭ2h2ī
1ṭ2h2ĺ̥
1ṭ2h2ŕ̥
1ṭ2h2ū
1ṭ2h2ḷ
1ṭ2h2ḹ
1ṭ2h2ṛ
1ṭ2h2ṝ
1ṭ2i
1ṭ2ḷ
1ṭ2l̥
1ṭ2o
1ṭ2ṛ
1ṭ2r̥
1ṭ2u
1ṭ2v2a
1ṭ2v2e
1ṭ2v2i
1ṭ2v2ḷ
1ṭ2v2l̥
1ṭ2v2o
1ṭ2v2ṛ
1ṭ2v2r̥
1ṭ2v2u
1ṭ2v2à
1ṭ2v2á
1ṭ2v2è
1ṭ2v2é
1ṭ2v2ì
1ṭ2v2í
1ṭ2v2ò
1ṭ2v2ó
1ṭ2v2ù
1ṭ2v2ú
1ṭ2v2ā
1ṭ2v2ī
1ṭ2v2ĺ̥
1ṭ2v2ŕ̥
1ṭ2v2ū
1ṭ2v2ḷ
1ṭ2v2ḹ
1ṭ2v2ṛ
1ṭ2v2ṝ
1ṭ2à
1ṭ2á
1ṭ2è
1ṭ2é
1ṭ2ì
1ṭ2í
1ṭ2ò
1ṭ2ó
1ṭ2ù
1ṭ2ú
1ṭ2ā
1ṭ2ī
1ṭ2ĺ̥
1ṭ2ŕ̥
1ṭ2ū
1ṭ2ḷ
1ṭ2ḹ
1ṭ2ṛ
1ṭ2ṝ
2ḥ1
2ḫ1
2ẖ1
2ṁ1
2m̐1
2ṃ1
2ḥ1
2ḫ1
2ṁ1
2ṃ1
2ẖ1
}
\endgroup
